test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-aores_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - åres: # N_ODD_VH (with vowel harmony)
    åres+N+Sg+Nom: åres
    åres+N+Sg+Gen: årrása
    åres+N+Sg+Acc: årrásav
    åres+N+Sg+Ill: årrásij
    åres+N+Sg+Ine: årrásin
    åres+N+Sg+Ela: [årrásist, årrásis]
    åres+N+Sg+Com: årrásijn
    åres+N+Pl+Nom: årrása
    åres+N+Pl+Gen: årrásij
    åres+N+Pl+Acc: årrásijd
    åres+N+Pl+Ill: årrásijda
    åres+N+Pl+Ine: årrásijn
    åres+N+Pl+Ela: [årrásijst, årrásijs]
    åres+N+Pl+Com: [årrásij, årrásijgum]
    åres+N+Ess: årrásin
    åres+N+Abe: årrásahtá
#    ålol+Dim+N+Sg+Nom: årrásatj # need to find out how DIM (derivation) is formalized!

 
 
